Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 34 REVISED UNIFORM ANATOMICAL GIFT ACT
§ 39-3424. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

§ 39-3425. Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits and supersedes the electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit or supersede section 101(a) of that act or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act.